Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.270

Stay of warrant.

Instead of issuing such warrant, the court may order the same to be stayed upon motion of the defendant, and upon his or her entering into a bond in such sum and with such surety as the court may direct to the state, conditioned either that the defendant will discontinue said nuisance, or that within a time limited by the court, and not exceeding six months, he or she will cause the same to be abated and removed, as either is directed by the court, and upon his or her default to perform the condition of his or her bond, the same shall be forfeited, and the court, upon being satisfied of such default, may order such warrant forthwith to issue, and an order to show cause why judgment should not be entered against the sureties of said bond.

[ 2011 c 336 s 220; 1957 c 45 s 3; Code 1881 s 1251; 1875 p 81 s 17; RRS s 9927.]